Tennessee, session 114, SB1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
May 1 of each year is observed as "Law Day," to honor the rule of law as the
bedrock of our political system.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010846